Washington statutes.
RCW 15.65.205

After any vote, referendum, nomination, or election—Affected parties provided results—Disputes.

(1) Upon completion of any vote, referendum, or nomination and elections, the department shall tally the results of the vote and provide the results to affected parties.

(2) If an affected party disputes the results of a vote, that affected party, within sixty days from the announced results, shall provide in writing a statement of why the vote is disputed and request a recount.

(3) Once the vote is tallied and distributed, all disputes are resolved, and all matters in a vote are finalized, the individual ballots may be destroyed.

[ 2002 c 313 s 19.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.